Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4302
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that protection against losses due to liability and damage or loss of property and provision of employee benefit plans is essential to the proper functioning of state and local government. The resources of state and local governmental agencies are often burdened by the securing of necessary insurance protection and employee benefits through standard insurance carriers. In addition, the Legislature finds that benefits can be derived through pooling of purchasing by state and local government. Proper risk management requires the spreading of risk so as to minimize fluctuation in insurance needs. The Legislature further finds that all contributions of financial and administrative resources made by state and local governmental agencies pursuant to an agreement authorized by the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act are made for a public and governmental purpose.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 664, § 1.